Washington statutes.
RCW 36.110.070

Board of directors may receive funds, establish fee schedule.

The board may receive funds from local, county, state, or federal sources and may receive grants to support its activities. The board may establish a reasonable schedule of suggested fees that will support statewide efforts to promote and facilitate jail industries that would be presented to cities and counties that have established jail industries programs.

[ 1993 c 285 s 7.]